Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
Vacation Time and Sick Leave

§ 25-3-91.
Definitions.

For purposes of Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-99, the following words and terms shall have the meaning described herein, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Appointing authority” shall mean such person, agency or authority authorized by law to employ individuals in state government, but shall not include the Board of Directors of the Mississippi Industries for the Blind.

“Catastrophic injury or illness” means a life-threatening injury or illness of an employee or a member of an employee’s immediate family which totally incapacitates the employee from work, as verified by a licensed physician, and forces the employee to exhaust all leave time earned by that employee, resulting in the loss of compensation from the state for the employee. Conditions that are short-term in nature, including, but not limited to, common illnesses such as influenza and the measles, and common injuries, are not catastrophic. Chronic illnesses or injuries, such as cancer or major surgery, which result in intermittent absences from work and which are long-term in nature and require long recuperation periods may be considered catastrophic.

“Employee” means a person appointed to a position in the state service or nonstate service as defined in Section 25-9-107, for which he is compensated on a full-time permanent or provisional basis, a temporary basis, or a part-time basis. However, in order for an employee to be eligible to receive donated leave, the employee must meet the requirements provided in Section 25-3-95(8).

“Workday” shall mean a day as defined in Section 25-1-98.

“Temporary employment” means the employment of a person in a temporary or time-limited position not to exceed twelve (12) months.

“Part-time employment” means the employment of a person in a part-time position.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 473, § 1; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 574, § 4; Laws, 2003, ch. 472, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Mar. 25, 2003).

§ 25-3-92.
Compensatory leave; administrative leave.

When, in the opinion of the appointing authority, it is essential that a state employee work after normal working hours, the employee may receive credit for compensatory leave. Except as otherwise provided in Section 37-13-89, when, in the opinion of the appointing authority, it is essential that a state employee work during an official state holiday, the employee shall receive credit for compensatory leave.

State employees may be granted administrative leave with pay. For the purposes of this section, “administrative leave” means discretionary leave with pay, other than personal leave or major medical leave.

The appointing authority may grant administrative leave to any employee serving as a witness or juror or party litigant, as verified by the clerk of the court, in addition to any fees paid for such services, and such services or necessary appearance in any court shall not be counted as personal leave.

The Governor or the appointing authority may grant administrative leave with pay to state employees on a local or statewide basis in the event of extreme weather conditions or in the event of a man-made, technological or natural disaster or emergency. Any employee on a previously approved leave during the affected period shall be eligible for such administrative leave granted by the Governor or appointing authority, and shall not be charged for his previously approved leave during the affected period.

The appointing authority may grant administrative leave with pay to any employee who is a certified disaster service volunteer of the American Red Cross who participates in specialized disaster relief services for the American Red Cross in this state and in states contiguous to this state when the American Red Cross requests the employee’s participation. Administrative leave granted under this paragraph shall not exceed twenty (20) days in any twelve-month period. An employee on leave under this paragraph shall not be deemed to be an employee of the state for purposes of workers’ compensation or for purposes of claims against the state allowed under Chapter 46, Title 11, Mississippi Code of 1972. As used in this paragraph, the term “disaster” includes disasters designated at level II and above in American Red Cross national regulations and procedures.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 3; Laws, 1982, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 343, § 1, ch. 500, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 307, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 314; Laws, 1994, ch. 397, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 529, § 2; Laws, 2015, ch. 368, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 25-3-93.
Personal leave.

Except as provided in subsection (1)(b), all employees and appointed officers of the State of Mississippi, who are employees as defined in Section 25-3-91, shall be allowed credit for personal leave computed as follows:

Click to view

However, employees who were hired prior to July 1, 1984, who have continuous service of more than five (5) years but not more than eight (8) years shall accrue fifteen (15) hours of personal leave each month.

Temporary employees who work less than a full workweek and part-time employees shall be allowed credit for personal leave computed on a pro rata basis. Faculty members employed by the eight (8) public universities on a nine-month contract, and employees of the public universities who do not contribute to the Mississippi Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Institutions of Higher Learning Optional Retirement Program, shall not be eligible for personal leave.

For the purpose of computing credit for personal leave, each appointed officer or employee shall be considered to work not more than five (5) days each week. Leaves of absence granted by the appointing authority for one (1) year or less shall be permitted without forfeiting previously accumulated continuous service. The provisions of this section shall not apply to military leaves of absence. The time for taking personal leave, except when such leave is taken due to an illness, shall be determined by the appointing authority of which such employees are employed.

For the purpose of Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-99, the earned personal leave of each employee shall be credited monthly after the completion of each calendar month of service, and the appointing authority shall not increase the amount of personal leave to an employee’s credit. It shall be unlawful for an appointing authority to grant personal leave in an amount greater than was earned and accumulated by the officer or employee.

Employees are encouraged to use earned personal leave. Personal leave may be used for vacations and personal business as scheduled by the appointing authority and shall be used for illnesses of the employee requiring absences of one (1) day or less. Accrued personal or compensatory leave shall be used for the first day of an employee’s illness requiring his absence of more than one (1) day. Accrued personal or compensatory leave may also be used for an illness in the employee’s immediate family as defined in Section 25-3-95. There shall be no limit to the accumulation of personal leave. Upon termination of employment each employee shall be paid for not more than thirty (30) days of accumulated personal leave. Unused personal leave in excess of thirty (30) days shall be counted as creditable service for the purposes of the retirement system as provided in Sections 25-11-103 and 25-13-5.

Any state law enforcement officer who is injured by wound or accident in the line of duty shall not be required to use earned personal leave during the period of recovery from such injury. As used in this subsection, the term “state law enforcement officer” means a person employed by a state agency who, as a condition of his or her employment, is required by law to complete a course of study at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy.

Any employee may donate a portion of his or her earned personal leave to another employee who is suffering from a catastrophic injury or illness, or to another employee who has a member of his or her immediate family who is suffering from a catastrophic injury or illness, in accordance with subsection (8) of Section 25-3-95.

Continuous Accrual Rate Accrual Rate Service (Monthly) (Annually) 1 month to 3 years 12 hours per month 18 days per year 37 months to 8 years 14 hours per month 21 days per year 97 months to 15 years 16 hours per month 24 days per year Over 15 years 18 hours per month 27 days per year

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 1977, ch. 473, § 2; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 4; Laws, 1984, ch. 307, § 2; Laws, 1988, ch. 553, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 364, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 428, § 3; Laws, 1996, ch. 348, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 519, § 3; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1999, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 472, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 341, § 1; Laws, 2005, ch. 411, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 495, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2014).

§ 25-3-95.
Major medical leave.

All employees and appointed officers of the State of Mississippi, except employees of the public universities who do not contribute to the Mississippi Public Employees’ Retirement System or the State Institutions of Higher Learning Optional Retirement Program, shall accrue credits for major medical leave as follows:

Click to view

Faculty members employed by the eight (8) public universities on a nine-month contract shall accrue credit for major medical leave as follows:

Click to view

Part-time employees shall accrue major medical leave on a pro rata basis. There shall be no maximum limit to major medical leave accumulation. All unused major medical leave shall be counted as creditable service for the purposes of the retirement system as provided in Sections 25-11-103 and 25-13-5.

Major medical leave may be used for the illness or injury of an employee or member of the employee’s immediate family as defined in subsection (3) of this section, only after the employee has used one (1) day of accrued personal or compensatory leave for each absence due to illness, or leave without pay if the employee has no accrued personal or compensatory leave; provided that faculty members employed by the eight (8) public universities on a nine-month basis may use major medical leave for the first day of absence due to illness. However, major medical leave may be used, without prior use of personal leave, to cover regularly scheduled visits to a doctor’s office or a hospital for the continuing treatment of a chronic disease, as certified in advance by a physician. For the purposes of this section, “physician” means a doctor of medicine, osteopathy, dental medicine, podiatry or chiropractic. For each absence due to illness of thirty-two (32) consecutive working hours (combined personal leave and major medical leave) major medical leave shall be authorized only when certified by their attending physician.

When an employee’s absence is due to a work-related injury for which the employee is receiving temporary disability benefits under Section 71-3-17(b) or 71-3-21, the injured employee shall not use accrued personal and/or medical leave and receive workers’ compensation benefits simultaneously if the combined receipt of both benefits results in the employee being paid, while absent due to the work-related injury, a total amount that exceeds one hundred percent (100%) of his wages earned in state employment at the time of injury. In such cases, the injured employee may use only as much of his accrued personal and/or medical leave as necessary, which may be fewer than eight (8) hours of accrued personal and/or major medical leave in a day, to constitute the difference between the amount of temporary disability workers’ compensation benefits received and one hundred percent (100%) of his wages earned at the time of injury in state employment. It is the intent of the Legislature that no state employee who is absent and disabled from work due to a work-related injury shall receive more than one hundred percent (100%) of his wages earned in state employment at the time of injury through the use of accrued personal and/or medical leave combined with temporary disability benefits under the Workers’ Compensation Law. The procedure for implementing this paragraph (b) shall be as directed by the applicable appointing authority. The receipt or payment of benefits in compliance with this paragraph (b) shall be considered the employee’s exclusive remedy against the employer in accordance with Section 71-3-9.

An employee may use up to three (3) days of earned major medical leave for each occurrence of death in the immediate family requiring the employee’s absence from work. No qualifying time or use of personal leave will be required prior to use of major medical leave for this purpose. For the purpose of this subsection (3), the immediate family is defined as spouse, parent, stepparent, sibling, child, stepchild, grandchild, grandparent, son- or daughter-in-law, mother- or father-in-law or brother- or sister-in-law. Child means a biological, adopted or foster child, or a child for whom the individual stands or stood in loco parentis.

Employees and appointed officers of the State of Mississippi having unused, accumulated sick leave or annual leave earned prior to July 1, 1984, shall be credited with major medical leave and personal leave as follows: All unused annual leave shall be credited as personal leave.

Unused sick leave shall be divided between major medical leave and personal leave at rates determined by the employee’s sick leave balance on June 30, 1984. The rates of conversion shall be as follows:

Click to view

Upon retirement from active employment each faculty member of the state-supported public universities who is employed on a nine-month basis shall receive credit and be paid for not more than thirty (30) days of unused major medical leave for service as a state employee. Unused major medical leave in excess of thirty (30) days shall be counted as creditable service for the purposes of the retirement system as provided in Sections 25-11-103 and 25-13-5.

Any state law enforcement officer who is injured by wound or accident in the line of duty shall not be required to use earned major medical leave during the period of recovery from such injury. As used in this subsection, the term “state law enforcement officer” means a person employed by a state agency who, as a condition of his or her employment, is required by law to complete a course of study at the Law Enforcement Officers Training Academy.

For the purpose of Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-99, the earned major medical leave of each employee shall be credited monthly after the completion of each calendar month, and the appointing authority shall not increase the amount of major medical leave to an employee’s credit. It shall be unlawful for an appointing authority to grant major medical leave in an amount greater than was earned and accumulated by the officer or employee.

Any employee may donate a portion of his or her earned personal leave or major medical leave to another employee who is suffering from a catastrophic injury or illness, as defined in Section 25-3-91, or to another employee who has a member of his or her immediate family who is suffering from a catastrophic injury or illness, in accordance with the following:

The employee donating the leave (the “donor employee”) shall designate the employee who is to receive the leave (the “recipient employee”) and the amount of earned personal leave and major medical leave that is to be donated, and shall notify the donor employee’s appointing authority or supervisor of his or her designation. The donor employee’s appointing authority or supervisor then shall notify the recipient employee’s appointing authority or supervisor of the amount of leave that has been donated by the donor employee to the recipient employee.

The maximum amount of earned personal leave that an employee may donate to any other employee may not exceed a number of days that would leave the donor employee with fewer than seven (7) days of personal leave left, and the maximum amount of earned major medical leave that an employee may donate to any other employee may not exceed fifty percent (50%) of the earned major medical leave of the donor employee. All donated leave shall be in increments of not less than twenty-four (24) hours.

An employee must have exhausted all of his or her earned personal leave and major medical leave before he or she will be eligible to receive any leave donated by another employee.

Before an employee may receive donated leave, he or she must provide his or her appointing authority or supervisor with a physician’s statement that states the beginning date of the catastrophic injury or illness, a description of the injury or illness, and a prognosis for recovery and the anticipated date that the recipient employee will be able to return to work.

If an employee is aggrieved by the decision of his or her appointing authority that the employee is not eligible to receive donated leave because the injury or illness of the employee or member of the employee’s immediate family is not, in the appointing authority’s determination, a catastrophic injury or illness, the employee may appeal the decision to the employee appeals board.

Beginning on March 25, 2003, the maximum period of time that an employee may use donated leave without resuming work at his or her place of employment is ninety (90) days, which commences on the first day that the recipient employee uses donated leave. Donated leave that is not used because a recipient employee has used the maximum amount of donated leave authorized under this paragraph shall be returned to the donor employees in the manner provided under paragraph (g) of this subsection.

If the total amount of leave that is donated to any employee is not used by the recipient employee, the donated leave shall be returned to the donor employees on a pro rata basis, based on the ratio of the number of days of leave donated by each donor employee to the total number of days of leave donated by all donor employees.

The failure of any appointing authority or supervisor of any employee to properly deduct an employee’s donation of leave to another employee from the donor employee’s earned personal leave or major medical leave shall constitute just cause for the dismissal of the appointing authority or supervisor.

No person through the use of coercion, threats or intimidation shall require or attempt to require any employee to donate his or her leave to another employee. Any person who alleges a violation of this paragraph shall report the violation to the executive head of the agency by whom he or she is employed or, if the alleged violator is the executive head of the agency, then the employee shall report the violation to the State Personnel Board. Any person found to have violated this paragraph shall be subject to removal from office or termination of employment.

No employee can donate leave after tendering notice of separation for any reason or after termination.

Recipient employees of agencies with more than five hundred (500) employees as of March 25, 2003, may receive donated leave only from donor employees within the same agency. A recipient employee in an agency with five hundred (500) or fewer employees as of March 25, 2003, may receive donated leave from any donor employee.

In order for an employee to be eligible to receive donated leave, the employee must:

Have been employed for a total of at least twelve (12) months by the employer on the date on which the leave is donated; and

Have been employed for at least one thousand two hundred fifty (1,250) hours of service with such employer during the previous twelve-month period from the date on which the leave is donated.

Donated leave shall not be used in lieu of disability retirement.

For the purposes of this subsection, “immediate family” means spouse, parent, stepparent, sibling, child or stepchild.

An employee may use up to six (6) weeks of earned major medical leave for the placement with the employee of a child for adoption or foster care and to care for the newly placed child within one (1) year of placement.

Continuous Accrual Rate Accrual Rate Service (Monthly) (Annually) 1 month to 3 years 8 hours per month 12 days per year 37 months to 8 years 7 hours per month 10.5 days per year 97 months to 15 years 6 hours per month 9 days per year Over 15 years 5 hours per month 7.5 days per year

Continuous Accrual Rate Accrual Rate Service (Per Month) (Per Academic Year) 1 month to 3 years 13-1/3 hours per month 15 days per academic year 37 months to 8 years 14-/ hours per month 1 5 16 days per academic year 97 months to 15 years 15-/ hours per month 2 5 17 days per academic year Over 15 years 16 hours per month 18 days per academic year

Sick Leave Percentage Percentage Balance as of Converted to Converted to June 30, 1984 Personal Leave Major Medical Leave 1 – 200 hours 20% 80% 201 – 400 hours 25% 75% 401 – 600 hours 30% 70% 601 or more hours 35% 65%

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 490, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 5; Laws, 1982, ch. 390, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 343, § 2; Laws, 1984, ch. 307, §§ 3, 4; Laws, 1988, ch. 553, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 364, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 451, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 428, § 4; Laws, 1996, ch. 348, § 2; Laws, 1997, ch. 519, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 1999, ch. 557, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 472, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 341, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 411, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 501, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 342, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 495, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 16, 2014).

§ 25-3-97.
Records; final payments upon leaving state employment; affidavits as to absences; transfer of accrued leave; employee’s death.

All organizations shall keep accurate records of the leave accumulated and used by the officers and employees thereof.

The appointing authority in nonstate service agencies within the meaning of Section 25-9-107 will develop rules for proper maintenance of leave records. The rules shall include provisions which shall keep the employee informed on a monthly basis as to his accumulated leave balances. For accounting purposes an employee’s anniversary date is the date of employment to full-time permanent or provisional service in state government.

The appointing authority in nonstate service agencies, in conjunction with the State Fiscal Officer, will develop rules for the final payment of accrued leave at such time that an employee leaves state employment. At no time will an employee be paid for accrued leave while still employed in state service, except that major medical leave pay may be made as heretofore provided. No payment will be made for accrued major medical leave except that an employee who presents medical evidence that his physical condition is such that he can no longer work in a capacity of state government may be paid for not more than one hundred twenty (120) days of earned major medical leave.

The State Fiscal Officer, before issuing a warrant to any of said employees for the payment of his salary, shall be furnished by each appointing authority any reports as required by the State Fiscal Officer as to absences in the department. The appointing authority shall make the required deduction from the salary as indicated on the affidavit in submitting their payroll requisitions to the Department of Finance and Administration, or if the State Fiscal Officer learns of such excessive absence from some other source, he is empowered to make such deduction, unless such absence shall have been for official business, personal leave, or by the permission of the Governor previously obtained. The State Fiscal Officer may promulgate rules on reporting absences in the agencies.

All accrued leave, both major medical and personal leave, earned by employees shall be transferrable between or among any and all state agencies, junior colleges and senior colleges. Each appointing authority shall be furnished a statement of accrued leave at the time of transfer by an employee.

Should an employee die having accumulated personal leave as provided in Section 25-3-93, the wages or salary which would have been paid to such employee during his leave shall be paid to the person designated by such employee for this purpose or, in the absence of such designation, to the beneficiary of such employee as recorded with the Public Employees’ Retirement System. Accumulated leave shall be considered for the purpose of Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-99 as wages or salary earned and not paid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 490, § 4; Laws, 1977, ch. 473, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 6; Laws, 1984, ch. 307, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1984; Laws, 1996, ch. 348, § 3; Laws, 1998, ch. 366, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1998.

§ 25-3-99.
Prior payment of leave earned unaffected.

Nothing in Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-99 shall be construed to deny the payment of leave earned prior to July 1, 1976.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1976, ch. 490, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1976.

§ 25-3-101.
Promulgation of rules.

The state personnel board shall promulgate rules for the administration of Sections 25-3-91 through 25-3-99, which shall be binding upon state service agencies within the meaning of Section 25-9-107.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1981, ch. 504, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 25-3-103.
Mississippi Organ Donor Leave Law; legislative intent; definitions; paid leave; number of days of leave allowed; approval required; adoption of rules governing organ donation leave.

This section may be cited as the “Mississippi Organ Donor Leave Act.”

This section is intended to provide time off with pay for state employees who donate an organ, bone marrow, blood or blood platelets.

As used in this section:

“Agency” means any branch, department, board, committee or commission of state government, but does not include units of local government or school districts.

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Finance and Administration.

“Participating employee” means a permanent full-time or part-time employee who has been employed by an agency for a period of six (6) months or more and who donates an organ, bone marrow, blood or blood platelets.

On request, a participating employee subject to this section may be entitled to organ donation leave with pay.

An employee may use (i) up to thirty (30) days of organ donation leave in any twelve-month period to serve as a bone marrow donor, (ii) up to thirty (30) days of organ donation leave in any twelve-month period to serve as an organ donor, (iii) up to one (1) hour to donate blood every fifty-six (56) days, and (iv) up to two (2) hours to donate blood platelets in accordance with appropriate medical standards established by the American Red Cross or other nationally recognized standards. Leave under subparagraph (iv) may not be granted more than twenty-four (24) times in a twelve-month period.

An employee may use organ donation leave or other leave authorized in paragraph (b) of this section only after obtaining approval from the employee’s agency.

An employee shall not be required to use accumulated sick or vacation leave time before being eligible for organ donor leave.

The department must adopt rules governing organ donation leave, including rules that (i) establish conditions and procedures for requesting and approving leave, and (ii) require medical documentation of the proposed organ or bone marrow donation before leave is approved by the employing agency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2004, ch. 336, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2004.